pt-PT: Recursos de mobilidade: Pega de transporte; Rodízios ou rodas; Pernas dobráveis; Pés deslizantes ou niveladores; Nenhuma; Outro
sk-SK: Funkcie mobility: Rukoväť na prenášanie; Kolieska; Skladacie nohy; Klzáky alebo vyrovnávacie nožičky; Žiadne; Iné
nb: Mobilitetsfunksjoner: Bærehåndtak; Trinser eller hjul; Sammenleggbare ben; Glidere eller justerbare føtter; Ingen; Annet
es: Características de movilidad: Asa de transporte; Ruedas; Patas plegables; Deslizadores o patas niveladoras; Ninguno; Otro
vi: Tính năng di động: Quai xách; Bánh xe đa hướng hoặc bánh xe; Chân gập; Chân trượt hoặc chân cân bằng; Không có; Khác
th: คุณสมบัติการเคลื่อนที่: หูหิ้ว; ล้อเลื่อนหรือลูกล้อ; ขาพับได้; ฐานรองหรือขารองปรับระดับ; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
ja: モビリティ機能: キャリーハンドル; キャスターまたはホイール; 折りたたみ式脚; グライドまたはアジャスター; なし; その他
hu: Mobilitási jellemzők: Hordozófogantyú; Görgők vagy kerekek; Összecsukható lábak; Csúszótalpak vagy szintezőlábak; Nincs; Egyéb
cs: Funkce mobility: Rukojeť k přenášení; Kolečka; Skládací nohy; Kluzáky nebo vyrovnávací nožičky; Žádné; Jiné
sl-SI: Lastnosti mobilnosti: Ročaj za prenašanje; Kolesca; Zložljive noge; Drsniki ali nivelirne nogice; Brez; Drugo
de: Mobilitätsmerkmale: Tragegriff; Rollen oder Räder; Klappbare Beine; Gleiter oder Stellfüße; Keine; Sonstige
sv: Mobilitetsfunktioner: Bärhandtag; Hjul; Hopfällbara ben; Möbeltassar eller ställbara fötter; Inga; Annan
fi: Liikkuvuusominaisuudet: Kantokahva; Pyörät; Taitettavat jalat; Liukutassut tai säätöjalat; Ei mitään; Muu
ru: Функции мобильности: Ручка для переноски; Ролики или колеса; Складные ножки; Опоры скольжения или выравнивающие ножки; Нет; Другое
da: Mobilitetsfunktioner: Bærehåndtag; Hjul eller ruller; Foldbare ben; Glidere eller justerbare fødder; Ingen; Andet
en: Mobility features: Carry handle; Casters or wheels; Foldable legs; Glides or leveler feet; None; Other
zh-CN: 移动性能特征: 提手; 脚轮或车轮; 可折叠支腿; 滑块或水平调节脚; 无; 其他
lt-LT: Mobilumo funkcijos: Nešiojimo rankena; Ratukai; Sulankstomos kojelės; Slankikliai arba išlyginamosios kojelės; Nėra; Kita
ro-RO: Caracteristici de mobilitate: Mâner de transport; Role sau roți; Picioare pliabile; Piciorușe glisante sau reglabile; Fără; Altele
it: Caratteristiche di mobilità: Maniglia per il trasporto; Rotelle o ruote; Gambe pieghevoli; Piedini scorrevoli o livellatori; Nessuna; Altro
fr: Fonctions de mobilité: Poignée de transport; Roulettes ou roues; Pieds pliables; Patins ou pieds niveleurs; Aucune; Autre
pt-BR: Recursos de mobilidade: Alça de transporte; Rodízios ou rodas; Pernas dobráveis; Pés niveladores ou deslizantes; Nenhum; Outro
zh-TW: 移動性特色: 提把; 腳輪或車輪; 摺疊腳; 滑墊或水平腳座; 無; 其他
pl: Cechy mobilności: Uchwyt do przenoszenia; Kółka lub rolki; Składane nogi; Ślizgacze lub stopki poziomujące; Brak; Inne
el: Χαρακτηριστικά φορητότητας: Λαβή μεταφοράς; Ροδάκια ή τροχοί; Αναδιπλούμενα πόδια; Ολισθητήρες ή ρυθμιζόμενα πόδια; Κανένα; Άλλο
ko: 이동 편의 기능: 운반 손잡이; 캐스터 또는 바퀴; 접이식 다리; 글라이드 또는 수평 조절 발; 없음; 기타
nl: Mobiliteitskenmerken: Draaggreep; Zwenkwielen of wielen; Inklapbare poten; Glijders of stelvoeten; Geen; Overig
tr: Hareketlilik özellikleri: Taşıma sapı; Tekerlekli; Katlanabilir ayaklı; Kayar veya ayarlanabilir ayaklı; Hiçbiri; Diğer
bg-BG: Функции за мобилност: Дръжка за носене; Колелца; Сгъваеми крака; Плъзгачи или нивелиращи крачета; Няма; Друго
hr-HR: Značajke mobilnosti: Ručka za nošenje; Kotačići ili kotači; Sklopive noge; Klizači ili podesive nogice; Nema; Ostalo